Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1376
Division of Employee Relations; created;
Chief Negotiator; powers and duties.

There is hereby created
within the Department of Administrative Services the Division of Employee
Relations to be headed by the Chief Negotiator who shall be appointed by,
serve at the pleasure of, and represent the Governor. The Director of Administrative
Services may serve as the Chief Negotiator. The division shall be responsible
for negotiating and administering all labor contracts entered into by the
State of Nebraska, except that the division shall not be responsible for contracts
entered into by constitutional offices, the Board of Trustees of the Nebraska
State Colleges, and the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska.

The Chief Negotiator shall for agencies within the jurisdiction of the
division:

(1) Negotiate or supervise the negotiations of labor contracts on a
statewide basis;

(2) Be responsible for the administration of all collective-bargaining
agreements, except that the Chief Negotiator may delegate such responsibility
to designated representatives who may be employees of state agencies when
the Chief Negotiator deems it appropriate;

(3) Be vested with authority on all mandatory topics of bargaining to
negotiate the contracts. Contracts may adjust or change rates of pay and other
terms and conditions of employment that are mandatory topics of bargaining
pursuant to the Industrial Relations Act and the State Employees Collective
Bargaining Act;

(4) Make recommendations to the Governor and Legislature regarding wages,
hours, and conditions of employment for all unorganized employees. The recommendations submitted to the
Legislature shall be submitted electronically;

(5) Consult with agency and department heads regarding possible terms
of labor contracts and administration of agreements when appropriate; and

(6) Manage the day-to-day operations of the division.

The division and the Chief Negotiator may represent any of the constitutional
offices in labor contract negotiations and administration of contracts if
requested to do so by such offices by resolution of the governing officer
or body submitted to the Chief Negotiator and affected collective-bargaining
agent and filed with the commission.

The responsibilities for negotiating contracts with employees of the
Nebraska state colleges and the University of Nebraska shall not be exercised
by the division and the Chief Negotiator. The Board of Regents and the Board
of Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges shall be responsible for negotiating
contracts with exclusive collective-bargaining agents for their employees.

Laws 1987, LB 661, § 8;

Laws 1992, Third Spec. Sess., LB 14, § 28;

Laws 1997, LB 314, § 21;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 199.

Industrial Relations Act, see section 48-801.01.